New Jersey, session 221, A2923.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 3 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-88) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in this act: "County governing body" means the county board of chosen freeholders of [the] a pilot county. "County assessor" means the person appointed by [the] a county governing body pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-89) to assess property within the county for the purposes of taxation and exemption from taxation. "Department" means the Department of the Treasury. "Director" means the Director of the Division of Property Assessment in the Department of the Treasury. "Deputy county assessor" means the holder of a certified property assessor certificate who is employed by the office of the county assessor within [the] a pilot county and assigned to perform duties and responsibilities for the assessment of property for purposes of taxation under the supervision of the county assessor. "Division" means the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury. "Pilot county" means the County of Gloucester[,] and the County of Passaic. (cf:  P.L.2009, c.118, s.3) 2.    Section 4 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-89) is amended to read as follows: 4.    a.  On the first day of January of the first full calendar year next following the effective date of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et al.), or the effective date of P.L.    , c. (C.      ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), as appropriate, or as soon thereafter as may be practicable, the county governing body shall appoint a county assessor. b.    (1)  The county assessor shall be an employee of the pilot county and shall serve on a full-time basis for an initial five-year term. (2)   No person shall be appointed as county assessor unless that person holds a certified property assessor's certificate and has at least five years of experience as a municipal tax assessor or deputy county assessor in the pilot county in which the assessor is to be appointed, or held the position of county tax administrator prior to the appointment of the first county assessor pursuant to this section. (3)   The county assessor shall acquire tenure in office upon reappointment to a second five-year term and thereafter shall hold office during good behavior and efficiency, and shall not be removed for political reasons or for any cause other than incapacity, misconduct, disobedience of rules or regulations established by the director or by the county governing body, failure to meet the standards of performance established by the director, or schedules or standards adopted pursuant to P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et al.). c.     [The] A pilot county shall constitute a taxing district for the purpose of the assessment of property in the State. (cf:  P.L.2009, c.118, s.4) 3.    Section 5 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-90) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.  On or before December 31 of the third full calendar year next following the [effective date of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et al.)] appointment of the county assessor pursuant to subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-89), every municipality within the pilot county shall implement a real property revaluation. b.    (1)  The county assessor appointed pursuant to subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-89) shall assist the municipalities in meeting the requirements of subsection a. of this section through the promulgation of a phase-in plan for the orderly completion and implementation of the municipal revaluations, or by any other means he deems appropriate. (2)   The county assessor may waive the revaluation requirement for a particular municipality under subsection a. of this section upon his finding that the municipality implemented a revaluation within 24 months of the effective date of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et al.) or the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), as appropriate. c.     The cost of the revaluations required under subsection a. of this section shall be paid by the pilot county.  [The costs of a previous revaluation for a municipality that has been granted a waiver under paragraph (2) of subsection b. of this section shall be reimbursed by the pilot county.] Following the completion of the three year period established pursuant to subsection a. of this section, the State shall reimburse the pilot county for those amounts using funds made available to the pilot county from either the SHARE program pursuant to section 30 of P.L.2007, c.63 (C.40A:65-30) or from the Consolidation Fund established by P.L.2008, c.35, or both in equal installments, over three years.  If no such funding is available for this purpose, the State shall reimburse the pilot county using moneys available from the Property Tax Relief Fund, in equal installments, over three years. d.    The monies required to be paid for municipal revaluations by a pilot county pursuant to subsection c. of this section and the pilot county's administrative start-up costs shall not be included or considered a part of the county tax levy under section 4 of P.L.1976, c.68 (C.40A:4-45.4) or a part of the county's adjusted tax levy under sections 9 and 10 of P.L.2007, c.62 (C.40A:4-45.44 and 40A:4-45.45). e.     With respect to the filing of assessment appeals by property taxpayers in a municipality in a pilot county, an appeal filed by a property taxpayer before the completion of the three-year schedule established pursuant to subsection a. of section 12 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-97) shall be the financial responsibility of the municipality in which the property is located, including the responsibility for payment of funds due to such a taxpayer following the taxpayers successful assessment appeal.  Thereafter, all real property assessment appeals filed by property taxpayers in a pilot county shall be the responsibility of the pilot county. (cf:  P.L.2009, c.118, s.5) 4.    Section 13 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-98) is amended to read as follows: 13.  a.  A serving municipal tax assessor or deputy municipal tax assessor who holds tenure in the position, or who has obtained a certified tax assessor certificate immediately prior to the appointment of the [first] county assessor pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-89), shall be entitled to preference with regard to the appointment of deputy county assessors and assistant deputy county assessors pursuant to subsection a. of section 6 of P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-91). b.    Each person appointed as a deputy county assessor or an assistant deputy county assessor shall acquire tenure in office after serving three continuous years in the office. Thereafter, a deputy county assessor or assistant deputy county assessor shall hold office during good behavior and efficiency, and shall not be removed for political reasons or for any cause other than incapacity, misconduct, disobedience of rules or regulations established by the director or by the county governing body, failure to meet the standards of performance established by the director, or schedules or standards adopted pursuant to P.L.2009, c.118 (C.54:1-86 et al.). (cf:  P.L.2009, c.118, s.13) 5.    (New section)  The Director of the Division of Taxation in the Department of the Treasury, pursuant to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt rules and regulations as may be necessary to effectuate the provisions of P.L.    , c.     (C.    ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 6.    This act shall take effect immediately.